Hawaii statutes.
3.
Provisions Common to Benefits for Disability and Death

§386-51 Computation of average weekly
wages. Average weekly wages shall be computed in a manner that the
resulting amount represents most fairly, in the light of the employee's
employment pattern and the duration of the employee's disability, the injured
employee's average weekly wages from all covered employment at the time of the
personal injury. In no event, however, shall an employee's average weekly
wages be computed to be less than the employee's hourly rate of pay multiplied
by thirty-five; provided that where the employee holds part-time employment of
fewer than thirty-five hours per week, the employee's average weekly wages
shall be the hourly rate at the place of employment where the injury occurred
multiplied by the average hours worked in the fifty-two weeks (or portions
thereof) preceding the week in which the injury occurred, for the calculation
of temporary partial disability and temporary total disability benefits only.
Other benefits including permanent partial disability, permanent total
disability, and death shall be calculated as if the employee had been a
full-time employee.

(1) Where appropriate and feasible, computation shall
be made on the basis of the injured employee's earnings from covered employment
during the twelve months preceding the employee's personal injury; but if
during that period, the employee, because of sickness or similar personal
circumstances was unable to engage in employment for one or more weeks then the
number of those weeks shall not be included in the computation of the average
weekly wage.

(2) Where an employee at the time of the injury was
employed at higher wages than during any other period of the preceding twelve
months then the employee's average weekly wages shall be computed exclusively
on the basis of the higher wages.

(3) Where, by reason of the shortness of the time
during which the employee has been in the employment or the casual nature or
terms of the employment, it is not feasible to compute the average weekly wages
on the basis of the injured employee's own earnings from that employment,
regard may be had to the average weekly wages which during the twelve months
preceding the injury was being earned by an employee in comparable employment.

(4) Except as otherwise provided, the total average
weekly wages of any employee shall be computed at a lower amount than the
average weekly wages earned at the time of the injury by an employee in
comparable employment engaged as a full-time employee on an annual basis in the
type of employment in which the injury occurred.

(5) If an employee, while under twenty-five years of
age, sustains a work injury causing permanent disability or death, the
employee's average weekly wages shall be computed on the basis of the wages
which the employee would have earned in the employee's employment had the
employee been twenty-five years of age.

(6) The director may issue rules for the
determination of the average weekly wages in particular classes of cases, consistent
with the principles laid down in the first paragraph of this section. [L 1963,
c 116, pt of §1; Supp, §97-50; am L 1967, c 139, §1; HRS §386-51; am L 1970, c
53, §1; gen ch 1985; am L 1995, c 234, §11]

Cross References

Rulemaking, see chapter 91.

Volunteer emergency medical disaster response personnel, see
§321-23.3.

Law Journals and Reviews

Paragraph (5) not applicable to injuries sustained before its
effective date. Haw. Supp, 6 HBJ, no. 1 at 23 (1969).

Case Notes

Section limited by last paragraph of §386-42 applying to
aliens. 27 H. 431 (1923).

Overtime included as wages. 33 H. 412 (1935).

"Earnings" defined. 37 H. 517 (1947).

English rule to be used. 43 H. 173 (1959).

Par. (5): Where there is injury causing permanent disability
or death, use of hypothetical earnings at age twenty-five is proper to compute
benefits for both the permanent and temporary disabilities. 52 H. 577, 482
P.2d 151 (1971).

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next